Utah statutes.
61-2f-205.   Form of license -- Display of license.

(1)  The division shall issue to a licensee a wall license that contains:

(a)  the name and address of the licensee;

(b)  the seal of the state; and

(c)  any other matter prescribed by the division.

(2)  The division shall send the license described in Subsection (1) to the licensee at the address furnished by the licensee.

(3)  A principal broker shall keep the license of the principal broker and the license of any associate broker or sales agent affiliated with the principal broker in the office in which the licensee works to be made available on request.

